Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4319
Workers' compensation coverage; requirements; court; powers.

(1) All risk management pools shall comply with the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and all rules of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court.

(2) The Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court may, as provided by section 48-146.02, revoke or suspend the authority of a risk management pool to provide group self-insurance coverage of workers' compensation liability pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 19.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.